Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2717
Exemption of third person from liability.

A third person in good faith and without court order may act on the instructions of or otherwise deal with any person purporting to make a transfer or purporting to act in the capacity of a custodian and, in the absence of knowledge, is not responsible for determining:

(1) The validity of the purported custodian's designation;

(2) The propriety of or the authority under the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act for any act of the purported custodian;

(3) The validity or propriety under the Nebraska Uniform Transfers to Minors Act of any instrument or instructions executed or given either by the person purporting to make a transfer or by the purported custodian; or

(4) The propriety of the application of any property of the minor delivered to the purported custodian.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 17.